Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201881-3408
Coordinating professional, defined.

Coordinating professional means a licensee who coordinates, as appropriate, the work of all licensees involved in a project.

Laws 1997, LB 622, § 8;

Laws 2015, LB23, § 8.